Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.518

Scale weight.

"Scale weight" means the weight of a vehicle without a load.

[ 2010 c 161 s 139.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.